North Carolina, session 2025, HB1170.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred ten thousand eight hundred dollars ($210,800)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Bodegas
Alvarado, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to assist in the completion of converting an abandoned
industrial center into a community center suitable for multiple purposes, including recreation and
sports, located in the City of Winston-Salem.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1170-v-1*